Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1594HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 900 Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Every school district shall adopt a policy which defines 3 the term âinsufficient classroom spaceâ for that district. 4 The definition shall include standards related to the school 5 districtâs capacity to provide instruction to English learners, 6 as defined in section 280.4. 7